District of Columbia statutes.
5-1057

Applicability.

This subchapter shall apply upon adoption of regulations by the Chief to implement the provisions of this chapter. The Chief shall adopt such regulations within 60 days after March 11, 2015.

Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-194, § 517
as added Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-236, § 2(b), 62 DCR 485

History